District of Columbia statutes.
50-509

Provision for alternative arbitration system.

If the arbitration system established pursuant to § 50-503 cannot consistently handle complaints during the 60-day period as required by § 50-503(q)(4), and if the administration of the arbitration system results in expenditures beyond the sums budgeted annually for the program, the Mayor may certify an alternative arbitration system that complies with this chapter and rules issued to implement this chapter.

Mar. 14, 1985, D.C. Law 5-162, § 11, 32 DCR 160
1981 Ed., § 40-1309.